Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-1,111
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the State Acceptance of Gifts Act:

(1) Donor means (a) an individual, trustee, personal representative, or other legal representative of an individual or an organization, (b) any organization, corporation, foundation, or other entity, and (c) a nonfederal governmental agency;

(2) Gift means a voluntary transfer by any means, including a grant, bequest, or devise, of real property or tangible or intangible personal property, including money, by a donor to a state agency without full compensation;

(3) Real property means any estate or interest in land, including all buildings, fixtures, and improvements thereon and all rights-of-way, easements, rents, issues, profits, income, tenements, hereditaments, privileges, and appurtenances thereunto belonging, used, or enjoyed with such land, or any part thereof, except leases for a term not exceeding one year; and

(4) State agency means any agency, board, or commission of this state, excluding (a) the University of Nebraska, (b) the Nebraska state colleges, and (c) any agency, board, or commission of this state with statutory authority to accept gifts, to the extent of the authority granted.

Laws 2024, LB998, § 3.
July 1, 2025